District of Columbia statutes.
16-1045

Immunity.

The District and its officers and employees, a law enforcement officer, prosecuting attorney, clerk of court, or any state or local governmental official acting in an official capacity, is immune from civil and criminal liability for conduct arising out of the registration or enforcement of a foreign protection order or the detention or arrest of an alleged violator of a foreign protection order if the conduct was done in good faith in an effort to comply with this subchapter.

Apr. 11, 2003, D.C. Law 14-296, § 2(c), 50 DCR 320
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 6 of the Uniform Interstate Enforcement of Domestic Violence Protection Orders Act.